Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1407.01
Light-density rail line, defined.

Light-density rail line means any rail line classified as a light-density line by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to the federal act or by the division under the Light-Density Rail Line Assistance Act.

Laws 1980, LB 507, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 74-1404;

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 463, § 11.